Utah statutes.
72-4-118.   State highways -- SR-121 to SR-128, SR-130.

State highways include:

(1)  SR-121.  From Route 40 in Roosevelt northerly to Neola; then easterly through LaPoint and Maeser to Route 40 in Vernal.

(2)  SR-122.  From the Utah Railway right-of-way line near Hiawatha easterly to Route 10 near Carbon-Emery County line.

(3)  SR-123.  From Route 6 at Sunnyside Junction easterly to Sunnyside.

(4)  SR-124.  From Horse Canyon coal mine northerly through Columbia Junction to Route 123.

(5)  SR-125.  From Route 50 east of Delta easterly to Oak City; then northerly to Route 132 near Leamington.

(6)  SR-126.  From Fort Lane at Layton Parkway Interchange northerly to Route 89 at Hot Springs Junction.

(7)  SR-127.  From Route 110 easterly on Syracuse Road to a junction with Route 108 in Syracuse.

(8)  SR-128.  From Route 191 near Moab northeasterly along south bank of Colorado River to Dewey; then northerly to Route 70 approximately six miles west of Cisco.

(9)  SR-130.  From Route 15 northerly through Cedar City to Route 21 north of Minersville.



Amended by Chapter 336, 2012 General Session

